Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-719
Refunding bonds; election not required; payment; tax levy.

The new bonds as issued shall not require a vote of the people to authorize such issue, and they shall be paid, and the levy be made and tax collected for their payment, in accordance with laws governing the said bonds heretofore issued.

Laws 1879, § 3, p. 176;

R.S.1913, § 466;

C.S.1922, § 383;

C.S.1929, § 11-919;

R.S.1943, § 10-719.